en: Hair Accessories
xx: Hair Accessories
cs: Vlasové doplňky
da: Hårtilbehør
de: Haaraccessoires
es: Accesorios para el pelo
fr: Accessoires pour cheveux
it: Accessori per capelli
ja: ヘアアクセサリー
nl: Haaraccessoires
no: Hårtilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do włosów
pt: Acessórios para cabelo
ru: Аксессуары для волос
sv: Håraccessoarer
tr: Saç Aksesuarları

en: Hair Bun & Volume Shapers
xx: Hair Bun & Volume Shapers
cs: Vlasové drdoly a tvarovače
da: Tilbehør til hårknolde og fylde
de: Duttkissen
es: Rellenos para moños y para dar volumen al pelo
fr: Couronnes à chignons
it: Ciambelle e modellatori di volume per capelli
ja: お団子ヘア用リング・クッション
nl: Haardonuts
no: Hårtopper og volumformere
pl: Grzebyki i gumki do włosów
pt: Espumas para fazer coque
ru: Валики для пучков
sv: Hårmunk och volymformare
tr: Saç Topuzu ve Hacim Şekillendiricileri

en: Hair Combs
xx: Hair Combs
cs: Hřebeny
da: Hårkamme
de: Haarkämme
es: Peines
fr: Peignes à cheveux
it: Pettinini per capelli
ja: コーム
nl: Haarkammen
no: Kammer
pl: Grzebienie ozdobne
pt: Pentes para cabelo
ru: Расчёски для волос
sv: Hårkammar
tr: Tarak Tokalar

en: Hair Extensions
xx: Hair Extensions
cs: Příčesky
da: Hårextensions
de: Haarverlängerungen
es: Extensiones de cabello
fr: Extensions de cheveux
it: Extension per capelli
ja: ヘアエクステンション
nl: Haarextensies
no: Hårforlengelser
pl: Włosy do przedłużania
pt: Apliques
ru: Шиньоны
sv: Löshår
tr: Postişler

en: Hair Forks & Sticks
xx: Hair Forks & Sticks
cs: Spony a jehlice do vlasů
da: Hårspænder og hårpinde
de: Haargabeln
es: Horquillas para moños
fr: Barrettes à cheveux
it: Forcelle per capelli
ja: ヘアピン・かんざし
nl: Haarspelden
no: Hårpinner og -kammer
pl: Szpilki do włosów i kokówki
pt: Presilhas para cabelos
ru: Шпильки для волос
sv: Hårgafflar och pinnar
tr: Çatal ve Çubuk Tokalar

en: Hair clips
es: Pinzas para el pelo
fr: Barrettes pour les cheveux

en: Hair Nets
xx: Hair Nets
cs: Síťky na vlasy
da: Hårnet
de: Haarnetze
es: Redecillas para el pelo
fr: Filets pour cheveux
it: Retine per capelli
ja: ヘアネット
nl: Haarnetjes
no: Hårnett
pl: Siatki do włosów
pt: Redes de cabelo
ru: Сетки для волос
sv: Hårnät
tr: Saç Fileleri

en: Hair Pins\, Claws & Clips
xx: Hair Pins\, Claws & Clips
cs: Sponky\, vlásenky a svorky do vlasů
da: Hårnåle\, hårklemmer og hårspænder
de: Haarklammern\, -nadeln & -clips
es: Horquillas\, pinzas y clips para el pelo
fr: Barrettes\, pinces et épingles à cheveux
it: Forcine\, pinze e mollette per capelli
ja: ヘアピン・ヘアクリップ
nl: Haarspelden\, -klemmen en -clips
no: Hårnåler\, -klyper og -klemmer
pl: Szpilki\, klamry i spinki do włosów
pt: Grampos\, pinças e clipes
ru: Шпильки и заколки
sv: Hårnålar\, klämmor och hårspännen
tr: Tel Tokalar\, Kıskaçlı Tokalar ve Çıtçıtlı Tokalar

en: Barrettes
xx: Barrettes
cs: Sponky do vlasů
da: Hårklips
de: Haarspangen
es: Pasadores para el pelo
fr: Barrettes
it: Barrette
ja: バレッタ
nl: Haarspeldjes
no: Hårspenne
pl: Spinki do włosów
pt: Presilhas
ru: Заколки
sv: Hårspännen
tr: Çıtçıtlı Tokalar

en: Hair Claws & Clips
xx: Hair Claws & Clips
cs: Skřipce do vlasů
da: Hårklemmer og -spænder
de: Haarklammern & -clips
es: Pinzas y clips para el pelo
fr: Barrettes et pinces à cheveux
it: Pinze e mollette per capelli
ja: ヘアクロー・クリップ
nl: Haarklemmen en -clips
no: Hårklemmer og -klips
pl: Klamry do włosów
pt: Prendedores e grampos de cabelo
ru: Заколки-крабы
sv: Hårklämmor och hårclips
tr: Mandal ve Pens Tokalar

en: Hair Pins
xx: Hair Pins
cs: Vlásenky
da: Hårnåle
de: Haarnadeln
es: Horquillas para el pelo
fr: Épingles à cheveux
it: Forcine per capelli
ja: ヘアピン
nl: Haarpinnen
no: Hårnåler
pl: Szpilki do włosów
pt: Grampos de cabelo
ru: Шпильки
sv: Hårnålar
tr: Tel Tokalar

en: Hair Wreaths
xx: Hair Wreaths
cs: Věnečky do vlasů
da: Hårspiral
de: Haarkränze
es: Guirnaldas para el pelo
fr: Couronnes pour cheveux
it: Corone per capelli
ja: ヘアリース
nl: Haarkransen
no: Hårkranser
pl: Wianki do włosów
pt: Guirlandas de cabelo
ru: Венки для волос
sv: Hårkransar
tr: Çiçekli Taçlar

en: Headbands
xx: Headbands
cs: Čelenky
da: Hårbånd
de: Stirnbänder
es: Diademas y cintas
fr: Bandeaux
it: Fasce per capelli/cerchietti
ja: ヘッドバンド
nl: Hoofdbanden
no: Hodebånd
pl: Opaski do włosów
pt: Faixas de cabeça
ru: Повязки на голову
sv: Pannband
tr: Saç Bantları

en: Ponytail Holders, Hair ties
xx: Ponytail Holders
cs: Sponky na copy
da: Hårelastikker
de: Haargummis
es: Gomas del pelo, Gomas para el pelo
fr: Attaches pour queue de cheval, Élastiques pour les cheveux
it: Nastri elastici
ja: ヘアゴム・シュシュ
nl: Haarelastieken
no: Hestehaleholdere
pl: Gumki do włosów
pt: Amarradores de cabelo
ru: Резинки для волос
sv: Hårsnoddar
tr: At Kuyruğu Tokaları

en: Tiaras
xx: Tiaras
cs: Korunky
da: Tiaraer
de: Diademe
es: Tiaras
fr: Diadèmes
it: Diademi
ja: ティアラ
nl: Tiara's
no: Tiaraer
pl: Tiary
pt: Tiaras
ru: Тиары
sv: Tiaror
tr: Baş Süsleri

en: Wig Accessories
xx: Wig Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k parukám
da: Tilbehør til parykker
de: Perücken-Accessoires
es: Accesorios para pelucas
fr: Accessoires pour perruques
it: Accessori per parrucca
ja: かつら・ウィッグ関連用品
nl: Pruikaccessoires
no: Tilbehør til parykker
pl: Akcesoria do peruk
pt: Acessórios para peruca
ru: Принадлежности для париков
sv: Peruktillbehör
tr: Peruk Aksesuarları

en: Wig Caps
xx: Wig Caps
cs: Čepičky pod paruky
da: Parykhatte
de: Perückennetze
es: Gorros para pelucas
fr: Calottes pour perruques
it: Calotte per parrucca
ja: かつら・ウィッグ用インナーキャップ
nl: Pruikenkapjes
no: Parykknett
pl: Czepki pod peruki
pt: Toucas para peruca
ru: Колпаки для париков
sv: Perukmössor
tr: Peruk Boneleri

en: Wig Glue & Tape
xx: Wig Glue & Tape
cs: Lepidla a lepicí pásky na paruky
da: Paryklim og -tape
de: Perückenkleber
es: Cola y cinta adhesiva para pelucas
fr: Colle et ruban adhésif pour perruques
it: Colla e adesivi per parrucca
ja: かつら・ウィッグ用接着剤
nl: Pruikenlijm en -tape
no: Lim og teip til parykker
pl: Kleje i taśmy do peruk
pt: Cola e fita para peruca
ru: Клей и ленты для париков
sv: Peruklim
tr: Peruk Yapıştırıcısı ve Bandı

en: Wigs
xx: Wigs
cs: Paruky
da: Parykker
de: Perücken
es: Pelucas
fr: Perruques
it: Parrucche
ja: かつら・ウィッグ
nl: Pruiken
no: Parykker
pl: Peruki
pt: Perucas
ru: Парики
sv: Peruker
tr: Peruklar

en: Hand Muffs
xx: Hand Muffs
cs: Rukávníky
da: Håndmuffer
de: Muffe
es: Manguitos
fr: Manchons
it: Manicotti
ja: ハンドマフ
nl: Handmoffen
no: Håndmuffer
pl: Mufki
pt: Polainas de braço
ru: Муфты для рук
sv: Muffar
tr: Manşonlar